District of Columbia statutes.
16-316

Appointment and compensation of counsel; guardian ad litem.

(a)

When a petition for adoption has been filed and there has been no termination or relinquishment of parental rights with respect to the proposed adoptee or consent to the proposed adoption by a parent or guardian whose consent is required under [section 16-304], the Court may appoint an attorney to represent such parent or guardian in the adoption proceeding if the individual is financially unable to obtain adequate representation.

(b)

The Court may appoint a guardian ad litem who is an attorney to represent the child in an adoption proceeding. The guardian ad litem shall in general be charged with the representation of the child’s best interest.

(c)

An attorney appointed pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall be compensated in accordance with [section 16-2326.01], except that compensation in the adoption case shall be subject to the limitation set forth in [section 16-2326.01(b)(2)].

History

Jan. 23, 2004, Pub. L. 108-199, § 435, 118 Stat. 141